Hawaii statutes.
[F.] Full
Participation in School Act

§302A-481 Definitions. As used in this
subpart, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Caregiver" means any person who is
at least eighteen years of age and:

(1) Related by blood, marriage, or adoption to the minor,
including a person who is entitled to an award of custody pursuant to section
571-46(a)(2) but is not the legal custodian or guardian of the minor; or

(2) Has resided with the minor for a continuous
immediate preceding period of six months or more. [L 2003, c 99, pt of §1; am L
2008, c 114, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next